Tennessee, session 114, HB2512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
49-1-1301. Federal scholarship tax credit – election.
The department of education shall elect to participate in the federal tax credit
established under Section 70411 of Pub. L. No. 119-21 for individuals who make
qualified contributions to scholarship granting organizations.
49-1-1302. List of scholarship granting organizations.
(a) The department of education shall:
(1) By no later than January 1, annually submit to the United States
secretary of the treasury and publish on the department's website a list of all
scholarship granting organizations that meet the requirements under § 70411 of
Pub. L. No. 119-21 and are located in this state;
(2) Certify to the United States secretary of the treasury the department's
authority to submit the list on behalf of the state;
(3) Accept submissions from scholarship granting organizations
throughout the year for inclusion on the list submitted pursuant to subdivision
(a)(1); and
(4) Comply with any other requirement under Section 70411 of Pub. L.
No. 119-21, including any applicable federal regulations or guidance, to ensure
HB2512
012216
- 1 -

that this state is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning after December
31, 2026.
(b) A department, agency, or board of state government does not have authority
to promulgate a rule to implement this section.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012216